Washington statutes.
RCW 43.147.030

Cooperative activities encouraged.

It is the intent of chapter 251, Laws of 1991 to direct and encourage the establishment of cooperative activities between the seven legislative bodies of the region. The state representatives to the Pacific Northwest Economic Region shall work through appropriate channels to advance consideration of proposals developed by this body.

[ 1991 c 251 s 3.]